Missouri, session 2026, HB1610.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 516.120, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 516.120, to read as follows:
516.120. Within [five] three years:
(1) All actions upon contracts, obligations or liabilities, express or implied, except
those mentioned in section 516.110, and except upon judgments or decrees of a court of
record, and except where a different time is herein limited;
(2) An action upon a liability created by a statute other than a penalty or forfeiture;
(3) An action for trespass on real estate;
(4) An action for taking, detaining or injuring any goods or chattels, including actions
for the recovery of specific personal property, or for any other injury to the person or rights of
another, not arising on contract and not herein otherwise enumerated;
(5) An action for relief on the ground of fraud, the cause of action in such case to be
deemed not to have accrued until the discovery by the aggrieved party, at any time within ten
years, of the facts constituting the fraud.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.